Hawaii statutes.
PART VI.
FEDERAL SOCIAL SECURITY FOR

PUBLIC
EMPLOYEES

Note

Extension of the Social Security Act provisions to East-West
Center employees. L 2004, c 176, §§1 to 4.

§88-211 Definitions. For the
purposes of this part:

(1) The term "wages" means all remuneration
for employment as defined herein, including the cash value of all remuneration
paid in any medium other than cash, except that the term shall not include that
part of the remuneration which, even if it were for "employment"
within the meaning of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, would not
constitute "wages" within the meaning of that Act;

(2) The term "employment" means any service
performed by an employee in the employ of the State, or any political
subdivision thereof, for such employer except

(A) Service which in the absence of an
agreement entered into under this part would constitute "employment"
as defined in the Social Security Act; or

(B) Service which under the Social Security
Act may not be included in an agreement between the State and the Department of
Health and Human Services entered into under this part. Service which under
the Social Security Act may be included in an agreement only upon certification
by the governor in accordance with section 218(d)(3) of that Act shall be
included in the term "employment" if and when the governor issues,
with respect to such service, a certificate to the Secretary of Health and
Human Services pursuant to section 88-219;

(3) The term "employee" includes an officer
of the State or political subdivision thereof;

(4) The term "state agency" means the executive
director of the state employees' retirement system;

(5) The term "Secretary of Health and Human
Services" includes an individual to whom the Secretary of Health and Human
Services has delegated any of the Secretary's functions under the Social
Security Act with respect to coverage under the Act of employees of the states
and territories and their political subdivisions;

(6) The term "political subdivision"
includes an instrumentality of the State, of one or more of its political
subdivisions, or of the State and one or more of its political subdivisions,
but only if the instrumentality is a juristic entity which is legally separate
and distinct from the State or subdivision and only if its employees are not by
virtue of their relation to the juristic entity employees of the State or
subdivision;

(7) The term "Social Security Act" means
the Act of Congress approved August 14, 1935, chapter 531, 49 Statutes At
Large 620, officially cited as the "Social Security Act", (including
regulations and requirements issued pursuant thereto), as such Act has been and
may from time to time be amended;

(8) The term "Federal Insurance Contributions
Act" means subchapter A of chapter 9 of the federal Internal Revenue Code
of 1939 and subchapters A and B of chapter 21 of the federal Internal Revenue
Code of 1954, as such Codes have been and may from time to time be amended; and
the term "employee tax" means the tax imposed by section 1400 of the
Code of 1939 and section 3101 of the Code of 1954. [L 1953, c 217, §2; RL 1955,
§6-190; am L 1957, c 284, §§2, 3; HRS §88-211; gen ch 1985; am L 1993, c 6, §6;
am L 2004, c 176, §5; am L 2013, c 23, §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next